Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.130

Compensation of officers and employees—Expenses—Nonstate pensions—Limitations.

The mayor and members of the town council may be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties upon presentation of a claim therefor and its allowance and approval by resolution of the town council. The mayor and members of the council may also receive such salary as the council may fix by ordinance.

The treasurer and treasurer-clerk shall severally receive at stated times a compensation to be fixed by ordinance.

The compensation of all other officers and employees shall be fixed from time to time by the council.

Any town that provides a pension for any of its employees under a plan not administered by the state must notify the state auditor of the existence of the plan at the time of an audit of the town by the auditor. No town may establish a pension plan for its employees that is not administered by the state, with the following exceptions:

(1) Participation in a defined contribution plan in existence as of January 1, 1990, is deemed to have been authorized. No town that provides a defined contribution plan for its employees as authorized by this section may make any material changes in the terms or conditions of the plan after June 7, 1990.

(2) Participation in a defined benefit pension plan that commenced prior to January 1, 1999, is authorized to continue. No town that commenced participation in a defined benefit pension plan that is not administered by the state may make any material changes in the terms or conditions of the plan after June 7, 1999.

[ 2012 c 240 s 1; 1993 c 47 s 3; 1990 c 212 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 87 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 270 s 9; 1965 c 105 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.130. Prior: 1961 c 89 s 5; prior: (i) 1941 c 115 s 2; 1890 p 200 s 147; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9168. (ii) 1921 c 24 s 1, part; 1890 p 209 s 168, part; RRS s 9187, part. (iii) 1890 p 214 s 173; RRS s 9191. (iv) 1943 c 183 s 1, part; 1941 c 91 s 1, part; 1911 c 33 s 1, part; 1903 c 113 s 5, part; 1890 p 198 s 144, part; RRS s 9165, part.]